District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.14

Limited immunity of petitioner.

(a)

Participation by a petitioner in a proceeding under this chapter before a responding tribunal, whether in person, by private attorney, or through services provided by the support enforcement agency, does not confer personal jurisdiction over the petitioner in another proceeding.

(b)

A petitioner is not amenable to service of civil process while physically present in the District to participate in a proceeding under this chapter.

(c)

The immunity granted by this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to a proceeding under this chapter committed by a party while present in the District to participate in the proceeding.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 313, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 314, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(14), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.13.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.13

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in subsec. (a), substituted “a proceeding under this chapter” for “a proceeding”.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-303.14 has been recodified as § 46-303.15 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(15).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 314 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).